Utah statutes.
72-2-107.   Appropriation from Transportation Fund -- Deposit in class B and class C roads account.

(1)  There is appropriated to the department from the Transportation Fund annually an amount equal to 30% of an amount which the director of finance shall compute in the following manner: The total revenue deposited into the Transportation Fund during the fiscal year from state highway-user taxes and fees, minus:

(a)  those amounts appropriated or transferred from the Transportation Fund during the same fiscal year to:

(i)  the Department of Public Safety;

(ii)  the State Tax Commission;

(iii)  the Division of Finance;

(iv)  the Utah Travel Council; and

(v)  any other amounts appropriated or transferred for any other state agencies not a part of the department; and

(b)  the amount of sales and use tax revenue deposited in the Transportation Fund in accordance with Section 59-12-103.

(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), all of this money shall be placed in an account to be known as the class B and class C roads account to be used as provided in this title.

(b)  The director of finance shall annually transfer $500,000 of the amount calculated under Subsection (1) to the department as dedicated credits for the State Park Access Highways Improvement Program created in Section 72-3-207.

(3)  Each quarter of every year the director of finance shall make the necessary accounting entries to transfer the money appropriated under this section to the class B and class C roads account.

(4)  The funds in the class B and class C roads account shall be expended under the direction of the department as the Legislature shall provide.

